src/fst/morphology/incoming/bla_phon2.regex
! L. Semivowel alternation (Frantz 1991, pp. 82--83)
! Note: the root oo `eat' arguably exhibits this too (cf. oo-i -> ooyi and
! oo-at -> oowat, Frantz 1991, p. 100, fn. 126)
define SVAltMorphs [
    i h t a |
    i h t s o o h k i t s i |
    i k a |
    i k k i a 7 |
    i k s i s s t o |
    i n s s t a |
    i s a k o o |
    i t s i |
    m a t s i |
    n a a t o |
    o h p i i |
    o h t o |
    s o p o |
    w a a h k o |
    w a a k o o 7 |
    w a a w o ] ;
define semivowelAlternation [
    [ [..] -> y || [ .#. | Bx ] SVAltMorphs _ Bx [ i | í ] ] .o.
    [ [..] -> w || [ .#. | Bx ] SVAltMorphs _ Bx [ o | ó | a | á ] ] ] ;

! M. Diphthongization
! This phenomenon involves stems that end in oo, ii or i and which change
! this final vowel to ao, ao, and a (respectively) before the 21 suffixes
! -o'p, -o's, and -o'k (Frantz 1991, p. 83). Note: I'm not sure how accent
! marking is affected by this rule or what exactly áóo is supposed to represent
! phonetically in itapáóo'pa (Frantz 1991, p. 83).
! Note: I think there are more stems that behave like this. I may need to
! make this into an optional rule in order to account for this ...
! Note 2: the <o> in the replacement is here made optional since sometimes this
! is transcribed as <aoo> and sometimes just <ao>. In fact, I am not sure what,
! exactly Frantz means by sequences like <aoo> and <aii>.
define 21Sfxs Bx o 7 [ p (a) | [ s | k ] (i) ] [ Bx | .#. ] ;
define diphthongization [
    [ o o -> a (o) || [ .#. | Bx ] [
        i h t s i s |
        k i 7 t s i i k s o w |
        i s t t s s |
        i t a p |
        o h t s s a p |
        o p a s |
        s i s t s i k |
        s s k |
        w a a w a a t t s i s o w |
        y i i s t a p ] _ 21Sfxs ,
        [ .#. | Bx ] _ 21Sfxs ] .o.
    [ ó o -> a (o) || [ .#. | Bx ] s o w _ 21Sfxs ] .o.
    [ i i -> a (o) || [ o | ó ] p _ 21Sfxs ] .o.
    [ i -> a (o)   || [ .#. | Bx ] [ i s t a w a 7 s | i p i k s ] _ 21Sfxs ] ] ;

! N. Initial Change -ay- (Frantz 1991, p. 36)
! A small subset of stems beginning with sV or ICV (where C and V stand for any
! consonant and vowel), replacement of this initial sequence by sayV or CayV,
! respectively. This is possible only in word-initial position. Initial change
! is also found in some imperative forms and a few nominalized verbs.
! Note: this is REALLY UGLY! There has to be some better way of capturing this ...
define initialChangeAY [
    [ i k -> k a y || .#. _ [
        i i |
        i p p |
        i 7 t a w a a t o o |
        i 7 t a y i s s k s i m m a a ] [ .#. | "-" ] ] .o.
    [ i k s -> k a y || .#. _ i s s t a 7 p s s i [ .#. | Bx ] ] .o.
    [ i p -> p a y || .#. _ i p o 7 t a m i a p i k s s a t t s i i y i [ .#. | Bx ] ] .o.
    [ i p (->) p a y || .#. _ i p o t t a a [ .#. | Bx ] ] .o.
    [ k s (->) k a y || .#. _ i k k [ .#. | Bx ] ] .o.
    [ s -> s a y || .#. _ [ a 7 k a p | a t t s i k s s k a a ] [ .#. | Bx ] ] .o.
    [ s (->) s a y || .#. _ o o t a a [ .#. | Bx ] ] .o.
    [ i k s í í -> k s í í y i || .#. _ k s k a a a t [ .#. | Bx ] ] .o.
    [ i k a -> k á á || .#. _ y i h t s i [ .#. | Bx ] ] .o.
    [ i k a -> [ k a a | i i k á ] || .#. _ y i n n i [ .#. | Bx ] ] ] ;

! N.a. Initial Change ii- (Frantz 1991, p. 36)
! This is the ii-prefixation/ change-left-edge-vowels-to-ii initial
! change that the Grammar discusses. Since almost all verbs begin with
! a vowel, a semivowel, or <s> (given the conventions of the dictionary) we
! can use this fact to reduce the massive overgeneralization (i.e., to non-verbs)
! that this rule would otherwise bring about. Still, it's not pretty ...
! WARNING TODO !!!: VERB STEMS THAT ARE FUTURE OR IMPERFECTIVE SHOULD NOT UNDERGO INITIAL CHANGE LIKE THIS! THIS RULE CURRENTLY INCORRECTLY DOES THAT
define initialChangeII [
    [ [..] (->) i i    || [ .#. | .#. [ n i t | k i t | o t ] Bx ] _ [ s | w | y ] ] .o.
    [ vowels+ (->) i i || [ .#. | .#. [ n i t | k i t | o t ] Bx ] _ [ consonants | 7 | h ] ] ] ;

! O. yi-Loss
! Certain verb stems lose a final /yi/ when third person suffixes are added
! (Frantz & Russell 1995, p. xvii). Note: I assume that this only happens
! after -wa, -yi, and -yini, although maybe the third person suffixes of
! different moods have this effect also. Note also that this rule may be
! optional or speaker-conditioned (cf. the parenthesized yi-s in the
! dictionary).
define yiLoss [
    y i -> 0 || [ .#. | Bx] [
        i k k a n i k s o o h p i 7 |
        i n n i s i 7 |
        i p a i t a p i i |
        i t á 7 p a o h p i 7 |
        i t a p i i |
        i 7 t o m i k á ó h p a i 7 p i |
        o h p i 7 |
        o 7 t s s o p o k i i |
        s a a p o h p i 7 |
        s o y o o h p i 7 |
        s s k s s p o h p i 7 |
        w á á p a t s i i 7 |
        w a a t a p o k a 7 ]
        _
        [ y i | w a | y i n i ]
        [ .#. | Bx ] ] ;

! P. áyi DTP vowel elision
! According to Frantz (1991, p. 48) vowels are deleted before the DTP suffixes -áyi, -aistsi, and -aiksi
define DTPVowelElision [ vowels -> 0 ||
    _ Bx [ á y i | a i [ s t s i | k s i ] ] [ .#. | Bx ] ] ;

! Q. Irregular (lexical) breaking
! Certain verbs break (i.e., assibilate) preceding /t/ and /k/ even though
! they do not ostensible begin with a high front vowel. Examples are ooyi 'eat'
! (and its cousins), yo'kaa 'sleep', and yáapi 'see'. The first two of these
! are sometimes transcribed in the grammar as Ioyi and Io'kaa, respectively. Here I create
! an ad hoc, lexically sensitive rule ! to deal with these. Of course, there
! are probably other verbs that behave ! in this way.
! N.b. I replace the delimiter here to prevent the subsequent application of
! s-connection a which would undesirably lengthen the <s>.
define irregularBreaking [
    Bx -> s || [ t | k ] _ [
        o o [ y i | w a t ( o o ) ] |
        y o ' k a a ] [ .#. | Bx ] ] ; 

define irregularBreaking [
    [ o -> i || [ t | k ] Bx _ o [ y i | w a t ( o o ) ] [ .#. | Bx ] ] .o.
    [ y -> i || [ t | k ] Bx _ [ o 7 k a a | á a p i ] [ .#. | Bx ] ] ] ;

! R. Inverse Clipping
! The <o> of the inverse suffixes (-ok, -okoo, -oki) disappears before verbs
! that end in <t> (Frantz 1991, pp. 57--58).
! Note: the lengthening of this same <o> in different contexts is handled by
! the variable-length vowels rule.
define inverseClipping o -> 0 || t Bx _ k ( [ o o | i ] ) Bx ;


! Phonological Rules (cf. Frantz 1991, pp. 152--155)
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! 1.    C1-C2     ->     C2C2
! Gemination Original
! Note that this rule is actually quite contrived since it requires that the
! adjacent plosives be MADE adjacent by a previously applying rule. If they
! were underlyingly adjacent, then the so-called ``stop-stop epenthesis'' rule
! would insert /oh/ or /i/ between them. Note: geminationGeneral is not being
! used.
define geminationGeneral [
    [ plosives Bx -> p || _ p ] .o.
    [ plosives Bx -> t || _ t ] .o.
    [ plosives Bx -> k || _ k ] ] ;
define gemination [
    [ a n i s t -> a n i k || _ Bx k ] .o.
    [ t -> k || _ Bx k ] ] ;

! 2.    It    ->    Ist
! s-Insertion (assumes that "breaking I" is a phoneme)
! Note: since the dictionary does not use /I/, this rule is not being used.
! Instead it is assumed that words like waanIt 'say to' are represented
! phonemically as /waanist/ and there are special lexical rules to deal with
! /waanist-ok/ -> [waanikk], etc. (see above).
define sInsertion [..] -> s || I _ t ;

! 3.    C-s -> Css, V(')-s -> V(')-is
! s-Connection
! condition on s-Connection "B": the 's' is not part of a suffix;
! present implementation: transformation is optional.
define sConnection [
    [ Bx -> s || stops _ s ] .o.
    [ [..] (->) i || vowels (7) Bx _ s ] ] ;

! 4.    o-a    ->    aa
! o-Replacement
! note: for some speakers the o is deleted
! condition: where 'a' is not part of a suffix
! present implementation: rule is optional
define oReplacement [
    [ o (->) [ a | 0 ] , ó (->) [ á | 0 ] || _ Bx a ] .o.
    [ [ o | ó ] (->) [ á | 0 ] || _ Bx á ] ] ;

! 5.    w-i(i)    ->    o
! Coalescence
define coalescence [
    w Bx i (i) -> o ,
    w Bx í (í) -> ó ||
    _ [ consonants | h | 7 ] ] ;

! 5b.   i -> o / C_w{a,o}
! Coalescence 2 (Frantz 1991, p. 70, fn. 79)
! TODO: implement this rule! Test based on examples on p. 69 of grammar

! 6.    k-I    ->    ksi
! Breaking
! Note: the commented-out rule is what it should be. However, since
! the lexical items of the dictionary lack /I/, I use an optional 
! breaking transformation with /i/.
!define breaking Bx -> s || k _ I ;
define breaking Bx (->) s || k _ [ i | í ] ;

! 7.    I -> i
! Neutralization
! Again, since the dictionary does not use /I/, this rule is superfluous.
define neutralization I -> i ;

! 8. Desyllabification
define desyllabification [
    [ Bx i -> y || vowels _ [ a | á | o | ó ] ] .o.
    [ Bx o -> w || vowels _ [ a | á | i | í | ó ] ] ] ;

! 9.    !G    ->    0
! Semivowel Drop
define semivowelDrop glides -> 0 || .#. _ ;

! 10.    V1V1-V    ->    V1V
! Vowel Shortening
define vowelShortening [
    [ [ a | á ] -> 0 || [ a | á ] _ Bx vowels ] .o.
    [ [ i | í ] -> 0 || [ i | í ] _ Bx vowels ] .o.
    [ [ o | ó ] -> 0 || [ o | ó ] _ Bx vowels ] ] ;

! 11.    Vyi-{a,o}    ->    Vy{a,o}
! i-Loss 
define iLoss [
    [ [ i | í ] -> 0 || [ a | á | o | ó ] y _ [ a | á | o | ó ] ] .o.
    [ i y [ i | í ] -> i (i) y ,
      í y [ i | í ] -> í (í) y || _ [ a | á | o | ó ] ] ] ;

! 12.    si{a,o}    ->    s{a,o}
! i-Absorption
! ISSUE: the prominence on the deleted /i/ in this rule may persist;
! consider /w-mo7tsís-oaawa-istsi/ -> <o7tsóaawaistsi> from Frantz (1991, p. 69).
define iAbsorption [ i | í ] (Bx) -> 0 || s _ [ a | á | o | ó ] ;

! 13.    sihs    ->    ss
! ih-Loss
define ihLoss [ i | í ] Bx h -> 0 || s _ s ;

! 14.    ihs    ->    ss
! Presibilation
! While Frantz (1991, fn. 167) points out speaker- and dialect-level variation
! in this rule, this is not captured by the current implementation.
define presibilation [ i | í ] Bx h -> s || _ s ;

! 15.    CG    ->    C    , where C ne 7
! Semivowel Loss
define semivowelLoss glides -> 0 || obstruents Bx _ ;

! 16.    Ciyiy    ->    Ciiy
! y-Reduction (optional)
define yReduction [ y (->) 0 ||
    [ obstruents | 7 ] [ i | í ] _ [ i | í ] (Bx) y ] ;

! 17.    sih    ->    ss
! Postsibilation
define postsibilation [ i | í ] (Bx) h -> s || s _ ;

! 18.    ti    ->    tsi
! t-Affrication
define tAffrication Bx -> s || t _ [ i | í ] ;

! 19.    V7VC    ->    VV7C
! Glottal Metathesis
define glottalMetathesis [
    7 Bx a -> Bx a 7 ,
    7 Bx á -> Bx á 7 ,
    7 Bx a a -> Bx a a 7 ,
    7 Bx á á -> Bx á á 7 ,
    7 Bx i -> Bx i 7 ,
    7 Bx í -> Bx í 7 ,
    7 Bx i i -> Bx i i 7 ,
    7 Bx í í -> Bx í í 7 ,
    7 Bx o -> Bx o 7 ,
    7 Bx ó -> Bx ó 7 ,
    7 Bx o o -> Bx o o 7 ,
    7 Bx ó ó -> Bx ó ó 7 || vowels _ [ consonants | 7 | h ] ] ;


! 20.    VV1V17C    ->    VV1V1C
! Glottal Loss
! Note that glottal loss does not occur when the long vowel is a variable
! length one (Frantz 1991, p. 154). This is an unresolved issue that will
! probably cause problems. Future work should reconcile this generalization
! with the definition of variableLengthVowels above.
define glottalLoss [
    a a 7 -> a a ,
    á á 7 -> á á ,
    i i 7 -> i i ,
    í í 7 -> í í ,
    o o 7 -> o o ,
    ó ó 7 -> ó ó || vowels (Bx) _ consonants ] ;

! 21.    V7(s)CC    ->    VV(s)CC    , where C ne s
! Glottal Assimilation
define glottalAssimilation [
    a 7 -> a a ,
    á 7 -> á á ,
    i 7 -> i i ,
    í 7 -> í í ,
    o 7 -> o o ,
    ó 7 -> ó ó || _ (s) [ p p | t t | k k | m m | n n ] ] ;

! 22.    77    ->    7
! Glottal Reduction
define glottalReduction 7 7 -> 7 ;
